Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 22

Sale of Assets

48-22-101. Sale of assets in regular course of business and mortgage of assets.

A corporation may, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board of directors:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property in the usual and regular course of business;

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness (whether with or without recourse), or otherwise encumber any or all of its property whether or not in the usual and regular course of business; or

Transfer any or all of the corporation's assets to one (1) or more corporations or other entities all of the shares or interests of which are owned by the corporation.

Unless the charter requires it, approval by the shareholders of a transaction described in subsection (a) is not required.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 12.01; 2012, ch. 1051, § 40.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Nonprofit corporations, sale of assets, title 48, ch. 62.

48-22-102. Sale of assets other than in regular course of business.

A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property (with or without the good will) otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the corporation's board of directors, if the board of directors proposes and its shareholders approve the proposed transaction. The sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the properties (with or without the good will) of one (1) or more subsidiaries of a corporation in which such corporation owns shares possessing at least eighty percent (80%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock of the subsidiary then entitled to vote for the election of directors, otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business, shall be treated as a disposition within the meaning of this subsection (a) if the subsidiary or subsidiaries constitute all, or substantially all, of the properties of such corporation.

For a transaction to be authorized:

The board of directors must recommend the proposed transaction to the shareholders, unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the submission of the proposed transaction; and

The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the transaction.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed transaction on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with § 48-17-105. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a description of the transaction.

Unless the charter or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (c)) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the transaction to be authorized must be approved by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the transaction.

After a sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of property is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned (subject to any contractual rights) without further shareholder action.

A transaction that constitutes a distribution is governed by § 48-16-401 and not by this section.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 12.02; 1989, ch. 451, § 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1108.